New York, session 2025-2026, S8929.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 8 of section 2573 of the education law, as 2 amended by chapter 915 of the laws of 1963 and as renumbered by chapter 3 717 of the laws of 1970, is amended to read as follows: 4 8. No charges under this section shall be brought more than three 5 years after the occurrence of the alleged incompetency or misconduct 6 except where the charge is of misconduct which resulted in conviction 7 for a crime. This subdivision shall not apply to alleged misconduct that 8 would have constituted a violation of articles one hundred thirty, two 9 hundred sixty, or two hundred sixty-three of the penal law or misconduct 10 that would have made any district named under section twenty-five 11 hundred fifty of this article liable under the child victims act or the 12 adult survivors act, in which case proof of a conviction shall not be 13 required for the purposes of bringing charges. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09409-01-5